Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1204.03
Deputies; counties having a population of between 30,000 and 200,000 inhabitants; additional deputy; salary.

In counties having a population of more than thirty thousand inhabitants and not more than two hundred thousand inhabitants, there is hereby created the office of deputy county attorneys, and the county attorney of such county may at his discretion appoint additional deputy county attorneys for such county upon receiving the approval thereof by the county board. The salary of the additional deputy county attorneys, referred to in this section, shall be fixed by the county board.

Laws 1893, c. 2, § 1, p. 64;

Laws 1901, c. 8, § 1, p. 57;

R.S.1913, § 5599;

Laws 1917, c. 108, § 1, p. 278;

Laws 1919, c. 62, § 1, p. 169;

Laws 1921, c. 232, § 1, p. 830;

C.S.1922, § 4916;

Laws 1923, c. 41, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1927, c. 116, § 2, p. 326;

C.S.1929, § 26-904;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 14, p. 302;

R.S.1943, § 23-1204;

Laws 1947, c. 73, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1947, c. 72, § 2, p. 230;

Laws 1947, c. 62, § 5, p. 200;

Laws 1949, c. 42, § 1(4), p. 144;

Laws 1953, c. 56, § 2, p. 194.